Washington statutes.
RCW 18.25.112

"Unprofessional conduct"—Additional definition—Prosecution.

(1) In addition to those acts defined in chapter 18.130 RCW, the term "unprofessional conduct" as used in this chapter includes failing to differentiate chiropractic care from any and all other methods of healing at all times.

(2) Proceedings involving alleged unprofessional conduct shall be prosecuted by the attorney general upon the direction of the commission.

[ 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 116.]